Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.120

Actions resulting in jurisdiction of courts.

A degree-granting institution, whether located in this state or outside of this state, that conducts business of any kind, makes any offers, advertises, solicits, or enters into any contracts in this state or with a resident of this state is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state for any cause of action arising from the acts.

[ 1986 c 136 s 12.]